Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-155
National Guard; enlisted personnel; discharge.

An enlisted person discharged from service in the National Guard shall receive a discharge in writing in such form and with such classification as is or shall be prescribed by the laws or regulations of the United States. In time of peace discharges may be given prior to the expiration of terms of enlistment under such regulations as the United States may prescribe.

Laws 1929, c. 189, § 26, p. 663;

C.S.1929, § 55-132;

R.S.1943, § 55-133;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 53, p. 1598;

Laws 1984, LB 934, § 4.